North Carolina, session 2025, HB528.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Coastal Carolina Community College
for renovation of its Trades Building.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H528-v-1*